Georgia, session 2025_26, SB366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 13 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to controlled
substances, is amended in Code Section 16-13-71, relating to dangerous drug, by repealing
paragraph (506.8) of subsection (b) and paragraph (12.1) of subsection (c).
SECTION 2.
Chapter 4 of Title 26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to pharmacists and
pharmacies, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
S. B. 366
- 1 -

LC 52 0791
"26-4-7.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Ivermectin' means an antiparasitic drug with multiple uses, including, but not limited
to, in veterinary medicine, to prevent and treat heartworm and acariasis, and in human
medicine, to treat parasitic worms, head lice, and rosacea.
(2) 'Over-the-counter medication' means medication that may be legally sold and
purchased without a prescription or consultation with a pharmacist or other healthcare
professional.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, ivermectin suitable for human
use may be sold or purchased as an over-the-counter medication in this state."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 366
- 2 -